Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-514
Hunting wildlife
with artificial light; unlawful acts; exception; violation; penalty.

(1) Except
as provided in section 37-4,107, it shall be unlawful to hunt any wildlife
by projecting or casting the rays of a spotlight, headlight, or other artificial
light attached to or used from a vehicle or boat in any field, pasture, woodland,
forest, prairie, water area, or other area which may be inhabited by wildlife
while having in possession or control, either singly or as one of a group
of persons, any firearm or bow and arrow.

(2) Nothing in this section
shall prohibit (a) the
hunting on foot of raccoon with the aid of a handlight, (b) the
hunting of species of wildlife not protected by the Game Law in the protection
of property by landowners or operators or their regular employees on land
under their control on foot or from a motor vehicle with the aid of artificial
light, or (c) the taking of
nongame fish by means of bow and arrow from a vessel with the aid of artificial
light.

(3) Any person violating this
section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall be fined at least two hundred fifty dollars upon conviction.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 234;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 70;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 31.